Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1079
City of the metropolitan class; school district boundaries extended; tax levy; effect.

If the school district boundaries of a school district of a city of the metropolitan class extend outside the city, such part of the school district shall have its tax levy extended upon the county tax list, in the manner provided for in other school districts of the county, outside the school district of such city. Such taxes shall be paid to the county treasurer at the same time that other school district taxes are paid.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 725.